Washington statutes.
RCW 41.60.080

Employee suggestion program—Contests to encourage participation.

The board and agency heads may design and initiate contests between agencies and between agency suggestion evaluators to encourage participation in the suggestion program at management levels. Any tokens of recognition offered during these contests shall be nonmonetary and shall not be considered an award, or subject to RCW 41.60.030.

[ 1999 c 50 s 6; 1982 c 167 s 12; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 122 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 167: See note following RCW 41.60.015.